Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Chapter 9. Employer’s Liability and Workers’ Compensation
§ 690.
Certificate, form; copy of policy.

An employer subject to the provisions of this chapter who has workers’ compensation insurance coverage pursuant to section 687 or 689 of this title shall file with the Commissioner a certificate of the insurance in a form prescribed by the Commissioner. The certificate shall include the policy number, effective date, date of expiration, operations covered, and such other information the Commissioner requests. The certificate shall be signed by a duly authorized representative of the insurance or guarantee company that issued the insurance coverage. Upon request, the insurance or guarantee company shall file with the Commissioner a copy of the contract or policy of insurance issued.

In addition to any other authority provided to the Commissioner pursuant to this chapter, the Commissioner may issue a written request to an employer subject to the provisions of this chapter to provide a workers’ compensation compliance statement on a form provided by the Commissioner. For the purposes of this subsection, an employer includes subcontractors and independent contractors. The form shall require all the following information sorted by job site:
(b) (1) In addition to any other authority provided to the Commissioner pursuant to this chapter, the Commissioner may issue a written request to an employer subject to the provisions of this chapter to provide a workers’ compensation compliance statement on a form provided by the Commissioner. For the purposes of this subsection, an employer includes subcontractors and independent contractors. The form shall require all the following information sorted by job site:

The number of employees employed during the entire current workers’ compensation policy term or the previous year if no policy was in effect or partially in effect prior to the request and the effective dates of the term of any policies in effect.

The total number of hours for which compensation was paid.

A list of all subcontractors and 1099 workers and their function on the job site for the period in question.

The name of the workers’ compensation insurance carrier, the policy number, and the agent, if any.

As an attachment, the insurance policy declaration pages, including how much payroll the policy is covering and a designation of the hours that provide the basis of the appropriate National Council on Compensation Insurance classification code.

Any employer who fails to comply with this subsection or falsifies information on the compliance statement may be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than $5,000.00 for each week during which the noncompliance or falsification occurred and any costs and attorney’s fees required to enforce this subsection. The Commissioner may also seek injunctive relief in Washington Superior Court.

A compliance statement shall be a public record, and the Commissioner shall provide a copy of a compliance statement to any person on request. An insurance company provided with a compliance statement may investigate the information in the statement. Based on evidence that an employer is not in compliance with this chapter, the Commissioner shall request a compliance statement or an amended compliance statement from the employer, investigate further, and take appropriate enforcement action.

In the event the Commissioner receives a request for an employer to provide a compliance statement but finds no evidence of noncompliance with this chapter, the Commissioner shall provide timely notification of the findings to the requesting party.

HISTORY:

Amended

2007, No. 57

, § 1;

2009, No. 54

, § 80, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 691.
Posting of notice of compliance.

An employer who has complied with the provisions of this chapter relating to securing the payment of compensation to his or her employees and their dependents shall post and maintain, in a conspicuous place in and about each of his or her places of business, typewritten or printed notices in form prescribed by the Commissioner stating that fact.

§ 691a.
Posting of safety records.

In support of the State’s fundamental interest in ensuring the well-being of employees and employers, it is the intent of the General Assembly to improve the safety experience in the workplace.

An employer subject to the provisions of this chapter shall post a notice in the employer’s place of business to advise employees of where they may review the employer’s record of workplace safety, including workplace injury and illness data, in accordance with rules adopted by the Commissioner. The employer’s record of workplace safety, including workplace injury and illness data, shall be available for review by employees at the employer’s place of business and the Commissioner, but shall not otherwise be public information. The posting shall be in a format approved by the Commissioner. The posting may be in a format provided by the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 55.

§ 692.
Penalties; failure to insure; stop work orders.

Failure to insure. If after a hearing under section 688 of this title, the Commissioner determines that an employer has failed to comply with the provisions of section 687 of this title, the employer shall be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than $100.00 for every day for the first seven days the employer neglected to secure liability and not more than $150.00 for every day thereafter.

Stop-work orders. If an employer fails to comply with the provisions of section 687 of this title after investigation by the Commissioner, the Commissioner shall issue an emergency order to that employer to stop work until the employer has secured workers’ compensation insurance. If the Commissioner determines that issuing a stop-work order would immediately threaten the safety or health of the public, the Commissioner may permit work to continue until the immediate threat to public safety or health is removed. The Commissioner shall document the reasons for permitting work to continue, and the document shall be available to the public. In addition, the employer shall be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than $250.00 for every day that the employer fails to secure workers’ compensation coverage after the Commissioner issues an order to obtain insurance and may also be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than $250.00 for each employee for every day that the employer fails to secure workers’ compensation coverage as required in section 687 of this title. When a stop-work order is issued, the Commissioner shall post a notice at a conspicuous place on the work site of the employer informing the employees that their employer failed to comply with the provisions of section 687 of this title and that work at the work site has been ordered to cease until workers’ compensation insurance is secured. The stop-work order shall be rescinded as soon as the Commissioner determines that the employer is in compliance with section 687 of this title. An employer against whom a stop-work order has been issued is prohibited from contracting, directly or indirectly, with the State or any of its subdivisions for a period of up to three years following the date of the issuance of the stop-work order, as determined by the Commissioner in consultation with the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services or the Secretary of Transportation, as appropriate. Either the Secretary or the Commissioner, as appropriate, shall be consulted in any contest of the prohibition of the employer from contracting with the State or its subdivisions.

Penalty for violation of stop-work order. In addition to any other penalties, an employer who violates a stop-work order described in subsection (b) of this section is subject to:

a civil penalty of not more than $5,000.00 for the first violation and a civil penalty of not more than $10,000.00 for a second or subsequent violation; or

a criminal fine of not more than $10,000.00 or imprisonment for not more than 180 days, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. May 3, 1978;

1985, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

1997, No. 19

, §§ 8, 9;

2007, No. 57

, § 2;

2009, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2011, No. 50

, § 5, eff. May 26, 2011.

§ 693.
The insurance contract.

Every policy of insurance and every guarantee contract covering the liability of an employer for compensation shall cover the entire liability of such employer to his or her employees covered by such policy or contract and also shall contain a provision setting forth the right of the employees to enforce, in their own names, the liability of the insurance carrier in whole or in part for the payment of such compensation, either by filing a separate claim at any time or by making at any time the insurance carrier a party to the original claim. However, the payment in whole or in part of such compensation by either the employer or the insurance carrier shall, to the extent thereof, be a bar to the recovery against the other of the amount so paid.

§ 694.
Knowledge of employer to affect insurance carrier.

Such policies and contracts shall contain a provision that, as between the employee and the insurance carrier, notice to or knowledge of the occurrence of an injury on the part of the employer shall be deemed notice or knowledge, as the case may be on the part of the insurance carrier; that jurisdiction of the employer shall, for the purpose of this chapter, be jurisdiction of the insurance carrier; and that the insurance carrier shall in all things be bound by and subject to the orders, findings, decisions, or awards rendered against the employer for the payment of compensation under the provisions of this chapter.

§ 695.
Insolvency of employer not to release insurance carrier.

Such policies and contracts shall contain a provision to the effect that the insolvency or bankruptcy of the employer and his or her discharge therein shall not relieve the insurance carrier from the payment of compensation for injuries or death sustained by an employee during the life of such a policy or contract.

§ 696.
Cancellation of insurance contracts.

A policy or contract shall not be cancelled within the time specified in the policy or contract for its expiration, until at least 45 days after a notice of intention to cancel the policy or contract, on a date specified in the notice, has been filed in the office of the Commissioner and provided to the employer. The notice shall be filed with the Commissioner in accordance with rules adopted by the Commissioner and provided to the employer by certified mail. The cancellation shall not affect the liability of an insurance carrier on account of an injury occurring prior to cancellation.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1990;

2007, No. 57

, § 3;

2013, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 56.

§ 697.
Notice of intent not to renew policy.

An insurance carrier who does not intend to renew a workers’ compensation insurance policy or guarantee contract covering the liability of an employer under the provisions of this chapter shall give notice of its intention to the Commissioner and the covered employer at least 45 days prior to the expiration date stated in the policy or contract. The notice shall be given to the employer by certified mail. An insurance carrier who fails to give notice shall continue the policy or contract in force beyond its expiration date for 45 days from the day the notice is received by the Commissioner and the employer. However, if, on or before the expiration of the existing insurance or guarantee contract the insurance carrier has, by delivery of a renewal contract or otherwise, offered to continue the insurance, or if the employer notifies the insurance carrier in writing that the employer does not wish the insurance continued beyond the expiration date, or if the employer complies with the provisions of section 687 of this title, then the policy will expire upon notice to the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1989, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1990;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2007, No. 57

, § 4;

2013, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 57.

§ 698.
Insurance by State and municipalities.

The State and municipalities which are liable to their employees for compensation under the provisions of this chapter may insure with an authorized insurance carrier.

§ 699.
Employees not to pay for insurance.

An agreement by an employee to pay any portion of the cost of insurance of any kind maintained or carried by an employer for the purpose of securing compensation under the provisions of this chapter shall be void.
An employer who makes a deduction for such purpose from the wages or salary of an employee entitled to the benefits of this chapter shall be fined not more than $500.00.

§ 700.
Examination of policy.

At the request of a holder of a policy of workers’ compensation insurance, the Commissioner of Financial Regulation shall examine the policy to determine whether the proper assignment has been made as to classification, rates, and advance premium charged.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1989, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 25(b);

1995, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 38(a);

2011, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 2, 2012.

§ 701.
Reports of accidents by employers.

Every employer liable to pay compensation under the provisions of this chapter shall keep a record of all injuries, fatal or otherwise, sustained by his or her employees in the course of their employment and shall report such an injury causing an absence of one day or more, or necessitating medical attendance, to the Commissioner in writing upon forms to be procured from him or her for such purpose within 72 hours, Sundays and legal holidays excluded, after the occurrence of such an injury.
At the termination of the disability of such injured employee, such employer shall make a final report upon forms to be procured as herein provided.
If such disability extends beyond a period of 60 days, at the expiration of each 60-day period, such employer shall make a supplemental report to the Commissioner that such injured employee is still disabled and, at the termination of such disability, shall file a final report as provided in this section.

§ 702.
Contents; penalty.

Such reports shall state the name and nature of the business of the employer, the location of the place where the accident occurred, the name, age, sex, wages, and occupation of the injured employee and shall state the date and hour of the accident causing the injury, its nature and cause and such other information as may be required by the Commissioner. An employer who refuses or neglects to make such reports may be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than $100.00 per violation after notice and opportunity for hearing under section 688 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 703.
Reports of payments made by employers.

Within 60 days after disability, such employer or other party liable to pay the compensation provided for by this chapter shall file with the Commissioner a statement showing the total payments made or to be made for compensation and for medical services for such injured employee.

§ 704.
Reports, penalty.

An employer as defined in section 616 of this title, upon written request of the Commissioner, sent by certified mail, shall file on forms provided by the Commissioner such statistical information regarding employments, accidents arising out of or in the course of employment, and safety in employment, as the Commissioner may require. Such report shall be required not more than once in any calendar year and shall be on uniform forms applicable to all employers from whom such information is required. An employer who refuses or neglects to file the statistical report within 30 days after a request by the Commissioner, may be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than $1,000.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 19.

§ 705.
Registration, penalty.

The employers mentioned in section 704 of this title shall register with the Department of Labor, on forms provided by it, when commencing or ceasing business operations in the State and no fee shall be required by the State for that registration. An employer who refuses or neglects to register as required by this section may be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than $50.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 20;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006.

§ 706.
Construction.

Employer, as used in sections 704 and 705 of this title shall not be construed to include persons operating farms for agricultural purposes.

§ 707.
Repealed. 2003, No. 122 (Adj. Sess.), § 294(o).

§ 708.
Penalty for false representation.

Action by the Commissioner of Labor. A person who willfully makes a false statement or representation, for the purpose of obtaining any benefit or payment under the provisions of this chapter, either for herself or himself or for any other person, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than $20,000.00, and shall forfeit all or a portion of any right to compensation under the provisions of this chapter, as determined to be appropriate by the Commissioner after a determination by the Commissioner that the person has willfully made a false statement or representation of a material fact. In addition, an employer found to have violated this section is prohibited from contracting, directly or indirectly, with the State or any of its subdivisions for up to three years following the date the employer was found to have made a false statement or misrepresentation of a material fact, as determined by the Commissioner in consultation with the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services or the Secretary of Transportation, as appropriate. Either the Secretary or the Commissioner, as appropriate, shall be consulted in any contest relating to the prohibition of the employer from contracting with the State or its subdivisions.

When the Department of Labor has sufficient reason to believe that an employer has made a false statement or representation for the purpose of obtaining a lower workers’ compensation premium, the Department shall refer the alleged violation to the Commissioner of Financial Regulation for the Commissioner’s consideration of enforcement pursuant to

8 V.S.A. § 3661(c)

.

Any penalty assessed or order issued under this chapter or

8 V.S.A. § 3661

shall continue in effect against any successor employer that has one or more of the same principals or corporate officers as the employer against which the penalties were assessed or order issued and is engaged in the same or similar business.

Notwithstanding the assessment of an administrative penalty under this section, a person may be prosecuted under

13 V.S.A. § 2024

.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 21;

1995, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 38(a);

2007, No. 57

, § 5;

2009, No. 42

, § 11;

2009, No. 54

, § 79, eff. June 1, 2009;

2009, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2011, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 2, 2012.

§ 709.
Rules of construction.

In construing the provisions of this chapter, the rule of law that statutes in derogation of the common law are to be strictly construed shall not be applied.
The provisions of this chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effect its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

§ 710.
Unlawful discrimination.

No person, firm, or corporation shall refuse to employ any applicant for employment because the applicant asserted a claim for workers’ compensation benefits under this chapter or under the law of any state or of the United States. Nothing in this section shall require a person to employ an applicant who does not meet the qualifications of the position sought.

No person shall discharge or discriminate against an employee from employment because the employee asserted or attempted to assert a claim for benefits under this chapter or under the law of any state or of the United States.

The Department shall not include in any publication or public report the name or contact information of any individual who has alleged that an employer has made a false statement or misclassified any employees, unless it is required by law or necessary to enable enforcement of this chapter.

An employer shall not retaliate or take any other negative action against an individual because the employer knows or suspects that the individual has filed a complaint or reported a violation of this chapter, or has testified, assisted, or cooperated in any manner with the Department or other appropriate governmental agency or department in an investigation of misclassification, discrimination, or other violation of this chapter.

The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney may enforce the provisions of this section by restraining prohibited acts, seeking civil penalties, obtaining assurances of discontinuance, and conducting civil investigations in accordance with the procedures established in

9 V.S.A. §§ 2458-2461

as though a violation of this section were an unfair act in commerce.

The provisions against retaliation in subdivision 495(a)(8) of this title and the penalty and enforcement provisions of section 495b of this title shall apply to this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 9; amended

2009, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. June 1, 2010;

2013, No. 31

, § 9;

2017, No. 74

, § 43;

2017, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 711.
Workers’ Compensation Administration Fund.

The Workers’ Compensation Administration Fund is created pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5 to be expended by the Commissioner for the administration of the workers’ compensation and occupational disease programs. The Fund shall consist of contributions from employers made at a rate of 1.4 percent of the direct calendar year premium for workers’ compensation insurance, one percent of self-insured workers’ compensation losses, and one percent of workers’ compensation losses of corporations approved under this chapter. Disbursements from the Fund shall be on warrants drawn by the Commissioner of Finance and Management in anticipation of receipts authorized by this section.

Annually, the General Assembly shall establish the rate of contribution for the direct calendar year premium for workers’ compensation insurance. The rate shall equal the amount approved in the appropriations process for the program and the Department’s projection of salary and benefit increases for that fiscal year, less the amount collected in the prior calendar year under subsection (a) of this section from self-insured workers’ compensation losses and from corporations approved under this chapter, adjusted by any balance in the fund from the prior fiscal year, divided by the total direct calendar year premium for workers’ compensation insurance for the prior year.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 22; amended

1995, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 22, 1996;

1997, No. 59

, § 34, eff. June 30, 1997;

1997, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2003, No. 70

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 1, 2004;

2007, No. 76

, § 22;

2007, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2009, No. 47

, § 10;

2009, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

2011, No. 33

, § 5;

2017, No. 69

, § D.2, eff. June 8, 2017;

2017, No. 76

, § 4.

§ 712. Section 712 repealed effective July 1, 2026. Enforcement by Attorney General.

Following the referral of a complaint by the Commissioner of Labor pursuant to the provisions of section 3 of this title, the Attorney General may investigate a complaint that an employer has committed a willful, substantial, or systemic violation of section 687 or 708 of this chapter by claiming that it is not an employer as defined pursuant to subdivision 601(3) of this chapter or that an individual is not a worker or employee as defined pursuant to subdivision 601(14) of this chapter and may enforce those provisions by restraining prohibited acts, seeking civil penalties, obtaining assurances of discontinuance, and conducting civil investigations in accordance with the procedures established in

9 V.S.A. §§ 2458

-2461

as though an employer that violates section 687 or 708 of this chapter by claiming that it is not an employer as defined pursuant to subdivision 601(3) of this chapter or that an individual is not a worker or employee as defined pursuant to subdivision 601(14) of this chapter is committing an unfair act in commerce. Any employer, employment agency, or labor organization complained against shall have the same rights and remedies as specified in

9 V.S.A. §§ 2458

-2461

. The Superior Court may impose the same civil penalties and investigation costs and order other relief to the State of Vermont or an aggrieved employee for a violation of section 687 or 708 of this chapter and any related violations of the provisions of this chapter as they are authorized to impose or order under the provisions of 9 V.S.A. §§ 2458 and 2461 in an unfair act in commerce. In addition, the Superior Court may order restitution of wages or other benefits on behalf of an employee and may order reinstatement and other appropriate relief on behalf of an employee.

The Attorney General shall share information and coordinate investigatory and enforcement resources with the Departments of Financial Regulation, of Labor, and of Taxes pursuant to the provisions of section 3 of this title.
(b) (1) The Attorney General shall share information and coordinate investigatory and enforcement resources with the Departments of Financial Regulation, of Labor, and of Taxes pursuant to the provisions of section 3 of this title.

Upon receiving notice that the Attorney General has determined that an employer committed a violation of section 687 or 708 of this chapter by claiming that it was not an employer as defined pursuant to subdivision 601(3) of this chapter or that an individual was not a worker or employee as defined pursuant to subdivision 601(14) of this chapter, the Commissioners of Financial Regulation and of Taxes shall review whether the employer is in compliance with the insurance or tax laws that are under their jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 20, 2020; repealed on July 1, 2026 by

2019, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 11(b).